Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3722
Lodging
sales tax; collection; enforcement.

Unless otherwise specifically
provided, any sales tax on transient lodging imposed under the Nebraska Visitors
Development Act is in addition to that sales tax imposed under the provisions
of Chapter 77, article 27, and shall be interpreted, collected, remitted,
and enforced by the Tax Commissioner under the provisions of such article.
Any sales tax on transient lodging imposed under the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner monthly on or before
the twenty-fifth day of the month next succeeding each monthly period.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 16;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB210, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2011, § 81-1260;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 22.